src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! =============================== !
! Phonological converter for Kven !
! =============================== !

! This file tries out conversion from Kven orthography to a phonetic
! translation based upon IPA. There is a switch at the end to get 
! SAMPA instaead

! Usage:
! ./configure --enable-phonetic
! make
! cat text | preprocess | lookup src/phonetics/text2ipa-fkv.lookup.xfst 


! We might also add syllable boundaries. Here the simple version:
!cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sma.fst | cut -f2 | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sma.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' '  | see

! echo "dïhte lea 123" | preprocess | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/sma-num.fst | cut -f2 |
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sma.fst | cut -f2 | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sma.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' ' | l


echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
                   é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | 
                   â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý |
                   É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | 
                   Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý |
                   ʉ | ə ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž | 
             ɟ | ʎ | ɲ | ʧ ] ; 

define Sgm [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define Stop [ p | t | k | c | č | ʧ ] ;

define Alv [ t | T | d | D | ŧ | Ŧ | đ | Đ | s | S | l | L | r | R | n | N ] ;

define Son [ m | n | ŋ | ɲ | l | r | j | v | đ ] ;

define Nas [ m | M | n | N | ŋ | Ŋ | ɲ ] ;

!define Dummy %^SL ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ (ː) Cns*  ;
! define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ ;


echo << Rules>>

define down [ A -> a, Á -> á, B -> b, C -> c, Č -> č, D -> d, E -> e, F -> f, 
              G -> g, H -> h, I -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, 
              Ŋ -> ŋ, O -> o, P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, S -> s, Š -> š, T -> t, 
              U -> u, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z, Ž -> ž, Æ -> æ, 
              Ø -> ø, Å -> å, Ö -> ö, Ä -> ä, Ï -> i  ] ;

define LexicalRules j ï h   -> j e h || .#. _ .#. ;

define LoanwordAssimilation c h -> ʧ  ; ! n d -> ɲ ɲ ;

define ngRule n g -> ŋ ;

define fronth h -> ç || [ i| y ] _ ;
define backh h -> x || a _ ;

define nasAssimilation n -> m || Vow _ p ;

! Late rules

define åASo å -> o ;


echo << And now we go for IPA OUTPUTFORMAT >>

define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , ä -> æ , ö -> ø , v -> ʋ , š -> ʃ , ï -> ɨ , %^ -> %. ;

define COLONLENGTH   ɑ ɑ -> ɑ ː , e e -> e ː , i i -> i ː , o o -> o ː , u u -> u ː ,
                     y y -> y ː , ø ø -> ø ː , æ æ -> æ ː , ʉ ʉ -> ʉ ː , ɔ ɔ -> ɔ ː ,
                     b b -> b ː , β β -> β ː , ɸ ɸ -> ɸ ː , ɟ ɟ -> ɟ ː , c c -> c ː , 
                     d d -> d ː , ð ð -> ð ː , f f -> f ː , g g -> g ː , 
                     h h -> h ː , j j -> j ː , k k -> k ː , l l -> l ː , ʎ ʎ -> ʎ ː ,
                     m m -> m ː , n n -> n ː , ɲ ɲ -> ɲ ː , p p -> p ː , r r -> r ː , 
                     s s -> s ː , t t -> t ː , ʃ ʃ -> ʃ ː , ʋ ʋ -> ʋ ː ,
                    l̥ l̥  -> l̥ ː , r̥ r̥  -> r̥ ː , m̥ m̥ -> m̥ ː , n̥ n̥ -> n̥ ː , 
                    ŋ̊ ŋ̊ -> ŋ̊ ː , v̥ v̥ -> v̥ ː ,
                     ŋ ŋ -> ŋ ː ;

! Cleaning up
! define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;


echo <<Combining...>>

read regex [ 
    down 
.o. LexicalRules    
.o. LoanwordAssimilation    
.o. ngRule
.o. fronth
.o. backh
.o. åASo
.o. OUTPUTFORMAT
.o. COLONLENGTH

] ;

echo <<Inverting...>>




!  For reference: The SAMPA - IPA correspondence

!  SAMPA   IPA  Description
!  p       p    voiceless bilabial stop
!  b       b    voiced bilabial stop
!  t       t    voiceless alveolar or dental stop
!  d       d    voiced alveolar or dental stop
!  ts      ʦ    voiceless alveolar affricate
!  dz      ʣ    voiced alveolar affricate
!  tS      ʧ    voiceless postalveolar affricate
!  dZ      ʤ    voiced postalveolar affricate
!  c       c    voiceless palatal stop
!  J\      ɟ    (overstroked j)    voiced palatal stop
!  k       k    voiceless velar stop
!  g       g    voiced velar stop
!  q       q    voiceless uvular stop
!  p\      ɸ    (Greek phi)    voiceless bilabial fricative
!  B       β    (Greek beta)    voiced bilabial fricative
!          ϐ    (Greek beta alt)    voiced bilabial approximant
!  f       f    voiceless labiodental fricative
!  v       v    voiced labiodental fricative
!  T       θ    (Greek theta)    voiceless dental fricative
!          ϑ    (Greek theta alt)    voiceless dental approximant
!  D       ð    (Icelandic eth)    voiced dental fricative
!          δ    (Greek delta)    voiced dental approximant
!  s       s    voiceless alveolar fricative
!  z       z    voiced alveolar fricative
!  S       ʃ    voiceless postalveolar fricative
!  Z       ʒ    voiced postalveolar fricative
!  C       ç    (cedilla)    voiceless palatal fricative
!  j\ (jj) ʝ    (j with crossed tail)    voiced palatal fricative
!  x       x    voiceless velar fricative
!  G       γ    (Greek gamma)    voiced velar fricative
!          ɰ    voiced velar approximant
!  X\      ħ    (overstroked h)    voiceless pharyngeal fricative
!  ?\      ʕ    (Inverted ?)    voiced pharyngeal fricative
!  h       h    voiceless glottal approximant
!  h\      ɦ    (h with upper tail to the right)    voiced glottal approximant
!  m       m    bilabial nasal
!  F       ɱ    (m with downward right tail)    labiodental nasal
!  n       n    alveolar or dental nasal
!  J       ɲ    (n with downward left tail)    palatal nasal
!  N       ŋ    (n with downward right tail)    velar nasal
!  l       l    alveolar lateral
!  L       ʎ    turned down y, alt. λ (Greek lambda)    palatal lateral
!  5       ɫ    (l with middle tilde)    velarized dental lateral
!  4 (r)   ɾ    (r without upper-left serif)    alveolar flap
!  r (rr)  r    alveolar trill
!  r\      ɹ    (r rotated 180°)    retroflexed alveolar approximant
!  R       ʀ    (small capital R)    uvular trill
!  P       ʋ    labiodental approximant
!  w       w    velo-labial approximant
!  H       ɥ    (turned down h)    palato-labial approximant
!  j       j    palatal approximant
!  
!  Vowels
!                front   near-front    central   near-back   back
!  close          i • y               1 • }                 M • u
!  near-close              I • Y                    U
!  close-mid      e • 2              @\ • 8                 7 • o
!  mid                                  @            
!  open-mid       E • 9               3 • 3\                V • O
!  near-open        {                    6           
!  open           a • &                                     A • Q



! More documentation
